North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-18 Teacher Qualifications

15.1-18-01.
Early childhood education teaching license.

The education standards and practices board shall issue an optional early childhood education teaching license or endorsement to an applicant who meets the requirements set by the board. The optional early childhood education teaching license may be used in nonparental settings such as early childhood programs, preschool programs, and head start programs.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 6; 2003, ch. 157, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2003 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 157, S.L. 2003 becomes effective July 1, 2006, pursuant to section 12 of chapter 157, S.L. 2003.

15.1-18-02.
Prekindergarten and kindergarten teacher requirements.

In order to teach prekindergarten and kindergarten, an individual must be:

Licensed to teach by the education standards and practices board or approved to teach by the education standards and practices board; and

Have a major in elementary education and a kindergarten endorsement;

Have a major equivalency in elementary education and a kindergarten endorsement;

Have a major in elementary education and an early childhood education endorsement;

Have a major equivalency in elementary education and an early childhood education endorsement;

Have a major in early childhood education;

Have a major equivalency in early childhood education; or

Have a minor in early childhood education .

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 6; 2003, ch. 157, § 3; 2005, ch. 163, § 4; 2017, ch. 138, § 2, effective April 13, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2003 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 157, S.L. 2003 becomes effective July 1, 2006, pursuant to section 12 of chapter 157, S.L. 2003.

15.1-18-02.1.
Grades one through twelve — Teacher requirements.

An individual who is licensed to teach by the education standards and practices board or approved to teach by the education standards and practices board may teach any grade from one through eight, provided the individual meets any requirements established in accordance with section 15.1-18-10 and has:

A major in elementary education; or

A major equivalency in elementary education.

An individual who is licensed to teach by the education standards and practices board or approved to teach by the education standards and practices board may teach any grade from five through eight, provided the individual has:

A major in middle level education; or

A major equivalency in middle level education.

An individual who is licensed to teach at the secondary level by the education standards and practices board or approved to teach at the secondary level by the education standards and practices board may teach any area at any grade from five through twelve, provided the individual has:

A major in the area being taught;

A major equivalency in the area being taught;

A minor in the area being taught; or

A minor equivalency in the area being taught.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 138, § 3, effective April 13, 2017.

15.1-18-03.
Grades nine through twelve — Teacher qualifications — Exceptions.

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 157, § 11.

15.1-18-04.
Student teacher — Eminence-credentialed teacher — Legal authority and status.

An individual assigned as a student teacher or employed as an eminence-credentialed teacher has the same legal authority and status as a licensed teacher employed by the school district. The authority extends to all aspects of student management and discipline, the handling of confidential student records, and to all legal authority granted to a licensed teacher in the state.

An individual assigned as a student teacher or employed as an eminence-credentialed teacher must be deemed a licensed teacher employed by the district with respect to acts performed by the individual at the direction of or with the consent of the district employees under whose supervision and control the individual performs duties, whether or not the duties are performed entirely in the presence of district employees assigned to supervise the individual.

An individual assigned as a student teacher or employed as an eminence-credentialed teacher must be deemed an employee of the school district for purposes of liability insurance coverage under sections 32-12.1-05 and 39-01-08.

For purposes of this chapter, “eminence-credentialed teacher” means an individual who provides teaching services in accordance with subsection 21 of section 15.1-09-33.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 6.

15.1-18-05.
Special education strategist credential.

In addition to any other credential, the superintendent of public instruction shall implement a special education strategist credential, effective August 1, 2001. Any individual who obtains a special education strategist credential and meets all other teacher licensure requirements imposed by statute may provide special education services in the areas of intellectual disabilities, emotional disturbance, and specific learning disabilities.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 186, § 3; 2011, ch. 207, § 2.

15.1-18-06.
Provisional special education strategist credential.

Beginning August 1, 2001, upon application the superintendent of public instruction shall issue a provisional special education strategist credential to any individual who is licensed to teach by the education standards and practices board or approved to teach by the education standards and practices board and who holds a credential applicable to the areas of intellectual disabilities, emotional disturbance, or specific learning disabilities. The provisional credential must be made available to the individual for the lesser of three years or the period of time required by the individual to complete the requirements for a special education strategist credential.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 186, § 4; 2011, ch. 207, § 3.

15.1-18-07.
Elementary school teacher qualifications. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 157, § 4; 2005, ch. 163, § 5; 2005, ch. 167, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 138, § 4, effective April 13, 2017.

15.1-18-08.
Middle school teacher qualifications. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 157, § 5; 2005, ch. 163, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 138, § 4, effective April 13, 2017.

15.1-18-09.
High school qualifications. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 157, § 6; 2005, ch. 163, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 138, § 4, effective April 13, 2017.

15.1-18-10.
Specialty areas — Teacher qualification. [Effective through July 31, 2023]

Notwithstanding the requirements of this chapter:

An individual may teach art, business education, computer education, a foreign language, music, physical education, special education, and technology education at any grade level from kindergarten through grade eight, provided the individual:

Is licensed to teach by the education standards and practices board;

Is approved to teach in that area by the education standards and practices board; and

Meets all requirements set forth in rule by the superintendent of public instruction.

An individual may teach Native American languages provided the individual is an eminence-credentialed teacher.

An individual may teach in the areas of trade, industry, technical occupations, or health occupations, provided the individual has been issued a license to teach in such areas by the education standards and practices board.

An individual may teach in any subject, except elementary education, special education, mathematics, science, language arts, and social studies, if the individual:

Has a permit issued by the board and has a high school diploma;

Possesses at least four thousand hours over five years of relevant work experience in the subject area to be taught; or

Possesses a certificate, permit, or degree in the subject area to be taught; and

Enrolls in the North Dakota teacher support system approved mentor program, expensed to the sending district.

The board of a school district may authorize an individual to teach under subsection 4 for one year, up to a maximum of three years, if:

The administrator of a school within the district submits a written request to the education standards and practices board which indicates the administrator is unable to locate a qualified applicant and requests the education standards and practices board issue a permit;

The individual successfully completes a background check conducted by the education standards and practices board; and

The education standards and practices board issues a permit to the individual.

The board may adopt rules to administer teaching permits under this section.

The board of a school district may terminate the employment of an individual with a teaching permit issued under this section at will.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 157, § 7; 2005, ch. 163, § 8; 2019, ch. 163, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 38, § 18, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 40, § 18, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 149, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

This section becomes effective July 1, 2006, pursuant to section 12 of chapter 157, S.L. 2003.

Note.

Section 15.1-18-10 was amended 4 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 18 of Chapter 40, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2015; Section 18 of Chapter 38, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2013; Section 5 of Chapter 149, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2265; and Section 1 of Chapter 163, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1531.

15.1-18-10.
Specialty areas — Teacher qualification. [Effective August 1, 2023]

Notwithstanding the requirements of this chapter:

An individual may teach art, business education, computer education, a foreign language, music, physical education, special education, and technology education at any grade level from kindergarten through grade eight, provided the individual:

Is licensed to teach by the education standards and practices board;

Is approved to teach in that area by the education standards and practices board; and

Meets all requirements set forth in rule by the superintendent of public instruction.

An individual may teach Native American languages provided the individual is an eminence-credentialed teacher.

An individual may teach in the areas of trade, industry, technical occupations, or health occupations, provided the individual has been issued a license to teach in such areas by the education standards and practices board.

An individual may teach in any subject, except elementary education, special education, mathematics, science, language arts, and social studies, if the individual:

Has a permit issued by the board and has a high school diploma;

Possesses at least four thousand hours over five years of relevant work experience in the subject area to be taught; or

Possesses a certificate, permit, or degree in the subject area to be taught; and

Enrolls in the North Dakota teacher support system approved mentor program, expensed to the sending district.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 157, § 7; 2005, ch. 163, § 8; 2019, ch. 163, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 38, § 18, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 40, § 18, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 149, § 5, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 163, § 1, effective August 1, 2023.

15.1-18-11.
Rural school districts — Federal flexibility.

The education standards and practices board may extend the effective dates for any provision in this chapter if the United States secretary of education by rule, policy, or guidance authorizes such extension.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 163, §
9.

15.1-18-12.
Military spouses.

Notwithstanding contrary provisions of this chapter regarding licensure qualifications, section 43-51-11.1, regarding licensure of a military spouse, applies to an applicant’s qualifications for licensure.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 369, § 4, effective July 1, 2019.